Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.240

Challenge determination.

When facts are determined under RCW 4.44.230, the rules of evidence applicable to testimony offered upon the trial of an ordinary issue of fact shall govern. The juror challenged, or any other person otherwise competent may be examined as a witness by either party. If the challenge is sustained, the juror shall be dismissed from the case; otherwise, the juror shall be retained.

[ 2003 c 406 s 12; Code 1881 s 218; 1877 p 45 s 222; 1869 p 54 s 222; RRS s 336.]